Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. DEFINITIONS.As used in this chapter:(1) "Adult" means an individual who is at least 18 years of age.(2) "Beneficiary" means an individual for whom property has been transferred to or held under a declaration of trust by a custodial trustee for the individual's use and benefit under this chapter.(3) "Conservator" means a person appointed or qualified by a court to manage the estate of an individual or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions.(4) "Court" means a superior court of this state.(5) "Custodial trust property" means an interest in property transferred to or held under a declaration of trust by a custodial trustee under this chapter and the income from and proceeds of that interest.(6) "Custodial trustee" means a person designated as trustee of a custodial trust under this chapter or a substitute or successor to the person designated.(7) "Guardian" means a person appointed or qualified by a court as a guardian of an individual, including a limited guardian, but not a person who is only a guardian ad litem.(8) "Incapacitated" means lacking the ability to manage property and business affairs effectively by reason of mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, chronic use of drugs, chronic intoxication, confinement, detention by a foreign power, disappearance, minority, or other disabling cause.(9) "Legal representative" means a personal representative or conservator.(10) "Member of the beneficiary's family" means a beneficiary's spouse, state registered domestic partner, descendant, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption.(11) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, joint venture, association, or any other legal or commercial entity.(12) "Personal representative" means an executor, administrator, or special administrator of a decedent's estate, a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions, or a successor to any of them.(13) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.(14) "Transferor" means a person who creates a custodial trust by transfer or declaration.(15) "Trust company" means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity, authorized to exercise general trust powers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. CUSTODIAL TRUSTâGENERAL.(1) A person may create a custodial trust of property by a written transfer of the property to another person, evidenced by registration or by other instrument of transfer, executed in any lawful manner, naming as beneficiary, an individual who may be the transferor, in which the transferee is designated, in substance, as custodial trustee under the Washington uniform custodial trust act.(2) A person may create a custodial trust of property by a written declaration, evidenced by registration of the property or by other instrument of declaration executed in any lawful manner, describing the property and naming as beneficiary an individual other than the declarant, in which the declarant as titleholder is designated, in substance, as custodial trustee under the Washington uniform custodial trust act. A registration or other declaration of trust for the sole benefit of the declarant is not a custodial trust under this chapter.(3) Title to custodial trust property is in the custodial trustee and the beneficial interest is in the beneficiary.(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a transferor may not terminate a custodial trust.(5) The beneficiary, if not incapacitated, or the conservator of an incapacitated beneficiary, may terminate a custodial trust by delivering to the custodial trustee a writing signed by the beneficiary or conservator declaring the termination. If not previously terminated, the custodial trust terminates on the death of the beneficiary.(6) Any person may augment existing custodial trust property by the addition of other property pursuant to this chapter.(7) The transferor may designate, or authorize the designation of, a successor custodial trustee in the trust instrument.(8) This chapter does not displace or restrict other means of creating trusts. A trust whose terms do not conform to this chapter may be enforceable according to its terms under other law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE FOR FUTURE PAYMENT OR TRANSFER.(1) A person having the right to designate the recipient of property payable or transferable upon a future event may create a custodial trust upon the occurrence of the future event by designating in writing the recipient, followed in substance by: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act."(2) Persons may be designated as substitute or successor custodial trustees to whom the property must be paid or transferred in the order named if the first designated custodial trustee is unable or unwilling to serve.(3) A designation under this section may be made in a will, a trust, a deed, a multiple-party account, an insurance policy, an instrument exercising a power of appointment, or a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights. Otherwise, to be effective, the designation must be registered with or delivered to the fiduciary, payor, issuer, or obligor of the future right.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. FORM AND EFFECT OF RECEIPT AND ACCEPTANCE BY CUSTODIAL TRUSTEEâJURISDICTION.(1) Obligations of a custodial trustee, including the obligation to follow directions of the beneficiary, arise under this chapter upon the custodial trustee's acceptance, express or implied, of the custodial trust property.(2) The custodial trustee's acceptance may be evidenced by a writing stating in substance:CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE'S RECEIPT AND ACCEPTANCEI, . . . . . (name of custodial trustee) acknowledge receipt of the custodial trust property described below or in the attached instrument and accept the custodial trust as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act. I undertake to administer and distribute the custodial trust property pursuant to the Washington uniform custodial trust act. My obligations as custodial trustee are subject to the directions of the beneficiary unless the beneficiary is designated as, is, or becomes incapacitated. The custodial trust property consists of . . . . . (description of property).Dated: . . . (date) . . .. . . . . (Signature of custodial trustee)(3) Upon accepting custodial trust property, a person designated as custodial trustee under this chapter is subject to personal jurisdiction of the court with respect to any matter relating to the custodial trust.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. TRANSFER TO CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE BY FIDUCIARY OR OBLIGORâFACILITY OF PAYMENT.(1) Unless otherwise directed by an instrument designating a custodial trustee pursuant to section 3 of this act, a person, including a fiduciary other than a custodial trustee, who holds property of or owes a debt to an incapacitated individual not having a conservator may make a transfer to an adult member of the beneficiary's family or to a trust company as custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the incapacitated individual. If the value of the property or the debt exceeds $20,000, the transfer is not effective unless authorized by the court.(2) A written acknowledgment of delivery, signed by a custodial trustee, is a sufficient receipt and discharge for property transferred to the custodial trustee pursuant to this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. MULTIPLE BENEFICIARIESâSEPARATE CUSTODIAL TRUSTSâSURVIVORSHIP.(1) Beneficial interests in a custodial trust created for multiple beneficiaries are deemed to be separate custodial trusts of equal undivided interests for each beneficiary. Except in a transfer or declaration for use and benefit of spouses or state registered domestic partners, for whom survivorship is presumed, a right of survivorship does not exist unless the instrument creating the custodial trust specifically provides for survivorship or survivorship is required as to community or marital property.(2) Custodial trust property held under this chapter by the same custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the same beneficiary may be administered as a single custodial trust.(3) A custodial trustee of custodial trust property held for more than one beneficiary shall separately account to each beneficiary pursuant to sections 7 and 15 of this act for the administration of the custodial trust.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. GENERAL DUTIES OF CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.(1) If appropriate, a custodial trustee shall register or record the instrument vesting title to custodial trust property.(2) If the beneficiary is not incapacitated, a custodial trustee shall follow the directions of the beneficiary in the management, control, investment, or retention of the custodial trust property. In the absence of effective contrary direction by the beneficiary while not incapacitated, the custodial trustee shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other law restricting investments by fiduciaries. However, a custodial trustee, in the custodial trustee's discretion, may retain any custodial trust property received from the transferor. If a custodial trustee has a special skill or expertise or is named custodial trustee on the basis of representation of a special skill or expertise, the custodial trustee shall use that skill or expertise.(3) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a custodial trustee shall take control of and collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial trust property.(4) A custodial trustee at all times shall keep custodial trust property of which the custodial trustee has control, separate from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial trust property of the beneficiary. Custodial trust property, the title to which is subject to recordation, is so identified if an appropriate instrument so identifying the property is recorded, and custodial trust property subject to registration is so identified if it is registered, or held in an account in the name of the custodial trustee, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act."(5) A custodial trustee shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial trust property, including information necessary for the preparation of tax returns, and shall make the records and information available at reasonable times to the beneficiary or legal representative of the beneficiary.(6) The exercise of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated beneficiary is not effective to terminate or direct the administration or distribution of a custodial trust.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. GENERAL POWERS OF CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.(1) A custodial trustee has the powers of a trustee under RCW 11.98.070.(2) This section does not relieve a custodial trustee from liability for a violation of section 7 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. USE OF CUSTODIAL TRUST PROPERTY.(1) A custodial trustee shall pay to the beneficiary or expend for the beneficiary's use and benefit so much or all of the custodial trust property as the beneficiary while not incapacitated may direct from time to time.(2) If the beneficiary is incapacitated, the custodial trustee shall expend so much or all of the custodial trust property as the custodial trustee considers advisable for the use and benefit of the beneficiary and individuals who were supported by the beneficiary when the beneficiary became incapacitated, or who are legally entitled to support by the beneficiary. Expenditures may be made in the manner, when, and to the extent that the custodial trustee determines suitable and proper, without court order and without regard to other support, income, or property of the beneficiary.(3) A custodial trustee may establish checking, savings, or other similar accounts of reasonable amounts under which either the custodial trustee or the beneficiary may withdraw funds from, or draw checks against, the accounts. Funds withdrawn from, or checks written against, the account by the beneficiary are distributions of custodial trust property by the custodial trustee to the beneficiary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. DETERMINATION OF INCAPACITYâEFFECT.(1) The custodial trustee shall administer the custodial trust as for an incapacitated beneficiary if: (a) The custodial trust was created under section 5 of this act; (b) the transferor has so directed in the instrument creating the custodial trust; or (c) the custodial trustee has determined that the beneficiary is incapacitated.(2) A custodial trustee may determine that the beneficiary is incapacitated in reliance upon: (a) Previous direction or authority given by the beneficiary while not incapacitated, including direction or authority pursuant to a durable power of attorney; (b) the certificate of the beneficiary's physician; or (c) other persuasive evidence.(3) If a custodial trustee for an incapacitated beneficiary reasonably concludes that the beneficiary's incapacity has ceased, or that circumstances concerning the beneficiary's ability to manage property and business affairs have changed since the creation of a custodial trust directing administration as for an incapacitated beneficiary, the custodial trustee may administer the trust as for a beneficiary who is not incapacitated.(4) On petition of the beneficiary, the custodial trustee, or other person interested in the custodial trust property or the welfare of the beneficiary, the court shall determine whether the beneficiary is incapacitated.(5) Absent determination of incapacity of the beneficiary under subsection (2) or (4) of this section, a custodial trustee who has reason to believe that the beneficiary is incapacitated shall administer the custodial trust in accordance with the provisions of this chapter applicable to an incapacitated beneficiary.(6) Incapacity of a beneficiary does not terminate: (a) The custodial trust; (b) any designation of a successor custodial trustee; (c) rights or powers of the custodial trustee; or (d) any immunities of third persons acting on instructions of the custodial trustee.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. EXEMPTION OF THIRD PERSON FROM LIABILITY.A third person in good faith and without a court order may act on instructions of, or otherwise deal with, a person purporting to make a transfer as, or purporting to act in the capacity of, a custodial trustee. In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, the third person is not responsible for determining:(1) The validity of the purported custodial trustee's designation;(2) The propriety of, or the authority under this chapter for, any action of the purported custodial trustee;(3) The validity or propriety of an instrument executed or instruction given pursuant to this chapter either by the person purporting to make a transfer or declaration or by the purported custodial trustee; or(4) The propriety of the application of property vested in the purported custodial trustee.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. LIABILITY TO THIRD PERSON.(1) A claim based on a contract entered into by a custodial trustee acting in a fiduciary capacity, an obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial trust property, or a tort committed in the course of administering the custodial trust, may be asserted by a third person against the custodial trust property by proceeding against the custodial trustee in a fiduciary capacity, whether or not the custodial trustee or the beneficiary is personally liable.(2) A custodial trustee is not personally liable to a third person:(a) On a contract properly entered into in a fiduciary capacity unless the custodial trustee fails to reveal that capacity or to identify the custodial trust in the contract; or(b) For an obligation arising from control of custodial trust property or for a tort committed in the course of the administration of the custodial trust unless the custodial trustee is personally at fault.(3) A beneficiary is not personally liable to a third person for an obligation arising from beneficial ownership of custodial trust property or for a tort committed in the course of administration of the custodial trust unless the beneficiary is personally in possession of the custodial trust property giving rise to the liability or is personally at fault.(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not preclude actions or proceedings to establish liability of the custodial trustee or beneficiary to the extent the person sued is protected as the insured by liability insurance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. DECLINATION, RESIGNATION, INCAPACITY, DEATH, OR REMOVAL OF CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE, DESIGNATION OF SUCCESSOR CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.(1) Before accepting the custodial trust property, a person designated as custodial trustee may decline to serve by notifying the person who made the designation, the transferor, or the transferor's legal representative. If an event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred, the substitute custodial trustee designated under section 3 of this act becomes the custodial trustee, or, if a substitute custodial trustee has not been designated, the person who made the designation may designate a substitute custodial trustee pursuant to section 3 of this act. In other cases, the transferor or the transferor's legal representative may designate a substitute custodial trustee.(2) A custodial trustee who has accepted the custodial trust property may resign by: (a) Delivering written notice to a successor custodial trustee, if any, the beneficiary, and, if the beneficiary is incapacitated, the beneficiary's conservator, if any; and (b) transferring or registering, or recording an appropriate instrument relating to, the custodial trust property, in the name of, and delivering the records to, the successor custodial trustee identified under subsection (3) of this section.(3) If a custodial trustee or successor custodial trustee is ineligible, resigns, dies, or becomes incapacitated, the successor designated under section 2(7) or 3 of this act becomes custodial trustee. If there is no effective provision for a successor, the beneficiary, if not incapacitated, may designate a successor custodial trustee. If the beneficiary is incapacitated, or fails to act within 90 days after the ineligibility, resignation, death, or incapacity of the custodial trustee, the beneficiary's conservator becomes successor custodial trustee. If the beneficiary does not have a conservator or the conservator fails to act, the resigning custodial trustee may designate a successor custodial trustee.(4) If a successor custodial trustee is not designated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodial trustee, an adult member of the beneficiary's family, the guardian of the beneficiary, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary, may petition the court to designate a successor custodial trustee.(5) A custodial trustee who declines to serve or resigns, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodial trustee, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial trust property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodial trustee. The successor custodial trustee may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial trust property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.(6) A beneficiary, the beneficiary's conservator, an adult member of the beneficiary's family, a guardian of the person of the beneficiary, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary, may petition the court to remove the custodial trustee for cause and designate a successor custodial trustee, to require the custodial trustee to furnish a bond or other security for the faithful performance of fiduciary duties, or for other appropriate relief.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. EXPENSES, COMPENSATION, AND BOND OF CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.Except as otherwise provided in the instrument creating the custodial trust, in an agreement with the beneficiary, or by court order, a custodial trustee:(1) Is entitled to reimbursement from custodial trust property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of fiduciary services;(2) Has a noncumulative election, to be made no later than six months after the end of each calendar year, to charge a reasonable compensation for fiduciary services performed during that year; and(3) Need not furnish a bond or other security for the faithful performance of fiduciary duties.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. REPORTING AND ACCOUNTING BY CUSTODIAL TRUSTEEâDETERMINATION OF LIABILITY OF CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.(1) Upon the acceptance of custodial trust property, the custodial trustee shall provide a written statement describing the custodial trust property and shall thereafter provide a written statement of the administration of the custodial trust property: (a) Once each year; (b) upon request at reasonable times by the beneficiary or the beneficiary's legal representative; (c) upon resignation or removal of the custodial trustee; and (d) upon termination of the custodial trust. The statements must be provided to the beneficiary or to the beneficiary's legal representative, if any. Upon termination of the beneficiary's interest, the custodial trustee shall furnish a current statement to the person to whom the custodial trust property is to be delivered.(2) A beneficiary, the beneficiary's legal representative, an adult member of the beneficiary's family, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court for an accounting by the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative.(3) A successor custodial trustee may petition the court for an accounting by a predecessor custodial trustee.(4) In an action or proceeding under this chapter or in any other proceeding, the court may require or permit the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative to account. The custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative may petition the court for approval of final accounts.(5) If a custodial trustee is removed, the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial trust property and records to the successor custodial trustee and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial trust property.(6) On petition of the custodial trustee or any person who could petition for an accounting, the court, after notice to interested persons, may issue instructions to the custodial trustee or review the propriety of the acts of a custodial trustee or the reasonableness of compensation determined by the custodial trustee for the services of the custodial trustee or others.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. LIMITATIONS OF ACTION AGAINST CUSTODIAL TRUSTEE.(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, unless previously barred by adjudication, consent, or limitation, a claim for relief against a custodial trustee for accounting or breach of duty is barred as to a beneficiary, a person to whom custodial trust property is to be paid or delivered, or the legal representative of an incapacitated or deceased beneficiary or payee:(a) Who has received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within two years after receipt of the final account or statement; or(b) Who has not received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within three years after the termination of the custodial trust.(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a claim for relief to recover from a custodial trustee for fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment related to the final settlement of the custodial trust or concealment of the existence of the custodial trust, is barred unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within five years after the termination of the custodial trust.(3) A claim for relief is not barred by this section if the claimant:(a) Is a minor, until the earlier of two years after the claimant becomes an adult or dies;(b) Is an incapacitated adult, until the earliest of two years after: (i) The appointment of a conservator; (ii) the removal of the incapacity; or (iii) the death of the claimant; or(c) Was an adult, now deceased, who was not incapacitated, until two years after the claimant's death.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. DISTRIBUTION ON TERMINATION.(1) Upon termination of a custodial trust, the custodial trustee shall transfer the unexpended custodial trust property:(a) To the beneficiary, if not incapacitated or deceased;(b) To the conservator or other recipient designated by the court for an incapacitated beneficiary; or(c) Upon the beneficiary's death, in the following order:(i) As last directed in a writing signed by the deceased beneficiary while not incapacitated and received by the custodial trustee during the life of the deceased beneficiary;(ii) To the survivor of multiple beneficiaries if survivorship is provided for pursuant to section 6 of this act;(iii) As designated in the instrument creating the custodial trust; or(iv) To the estate of the deceased beneficiary.(2) If, when the custodial trust would otherwise terminate, the distributee is incapacitated, the custodial trust continues for the use and benefit of the distributee as beneficiary until the incapacity is removed or the custodial trust is otherwise terminated.(3) Death of a beneficiary does not terminate the power of the custodial trustee to discharge obligations of the custodial trustee or beneficiary incurred before the termination of the custodial trust.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. METHODS AND FORMS FOR CREATING CUSTODIAL TRUSTS.(1) If a transaction, including a declaration with respect to or a transfer of specific property, otherwise satisfies applicable law, the criteria of section 2 of this act are satisfied by:(a) The execution and either delivery to the custodial trustee or recording of an instrument in substantially the following form:TRANSFER UNDER THE WASHINGTON UNIFORM CUSTODIAL TRUST ACTI, . . . . . (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary), transfer to . . . . . (name of trustee other than transferor), as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) as beneficiary and . . . . . (name of distributee) as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Washington uniform custodial trust act, the following:. . . . .. . . . .(insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property)Dated: . . . (date). . . . .(Signature); or(b) The execution and the recording or giving notice of its execution to the beneficiary of an instrument in substantially the following form:DECLARATION OF TRUST UNDER THE WASHINGTON UNIFORM CUSTODIAL TRUST ACTI, . . . . . (name of owner of property), declare that henceforth I hold as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary other than transferor) as beneficiary and . . . . . (name of distributee) as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Washington uniform custodial trust act, the following:. . . . .. . . . .(insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property)Dated: . . . (date). . . . .(Signature)(2) Customary methods of transferring or evidencing ownership of property may be used to create a custodial trust, including any of the following:(a) Registration of a security in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(b) Delivery of a certificated security, or a document necessary for the transfer of an uncertificated security, together with any necessary endorsement, to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodial trustee, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section;(c) Payment of money or transfer of a security held in the name of a broker or a financial institution or its nominee to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(d) Registration of ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract with the issuer in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(e) Delivery of a written assignment to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is designated in substance by the words: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(f) Irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment, pursuant to its terms, in favor of a trust company, an adult other than the donee of the power, or the donee who holds the power if the beneficiary is other than the donee, whose name in the appointment is designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(g) Delivery of a written notification or assignment of a right to future payment under a contract to an obligor which transfers the right under the contract to a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, whose name in the notification or assignment is designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(h) Execution, delivery, and recordation of a conveyance of an interest in real property in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act";(i) Issuance of a certificate of title by an agency of a state or of the United States which evidences title to tangible personal property:(A) Issued in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act"; or(B) Delivered to a trust company or an adult other than the transferor or endorsed by the transferor to that person, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act"; or(j) Execution and delivery of an instrument of gift to a trust company or an adult other than the transferor, designated in substance: ". . . . . as custodial trustee for . . . . . (name of beneficiary) under the Washington uniform custodial trust act."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. APPLICABLE LAW.(1) This chapter applies to a transfer or declaration creating a custodial trust that refers to this chapter if, at the time of the transfer or declaration, the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee is a resident of or has its principal place of business in this state or custodial trust property is located in this state. The custodial trust remains subject to this chapter despite a later change in residence or principal place of business of the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee, or removal of the custodial trust property from this state.(2) A transfer made pursuant to an act of another state substantially similar to this chapter is governed by the law of that state and may be enforced in this state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 21. SHORT TITLE.This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington uniform custodial trust act.Sec. 22. RCW 11.135.010 and 2024 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:In this chapter:(1) "Electronic record" means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.(2) "Electronic signature" means an electronic symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a record that uses a security procedure and is executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.(3) "Information" includes data, text, images, codes, computer programs, software, databases, and the like, and does not include videos or sounds.(4) "Nontestamentary estate planning document" means a record relating to estate planning that is readable as text at the time of signing and is not a will or contained in a will. The term:(a) Includes a record readable as text at the time of signing that creates, exercises, modifies, releases, or revokes:(i) An inter vivos trust governed by chapters 11.97, 11.98, 11.98B, 11.103, 11.110, ((and)) 11.118, and 11.--- (the new chapter created in section 23 of this act) RCW;(ii) A trust power held by a trustor, a trustee, a beneficiary(([,])), or a third party that is granted under the terms of a trust, under this title, specifically including chapters 11.97, 11.98, 11.98B, 11.103, 11.110, and 11.118 RCW, or by any other statute or rule of law related to trusts that requires a writing, written instrument, or a signed record or document;(iii) A certification of a trust under RCW 11.98.075;(iv) A power of attorney, including for health care of the principal or of the principal's minor children, that is durable under chapter 11.125 RCW;(v) An agent's certification under RCW 11.125.430 of the validity of a power of attorney and the agent's authority;(vi) A power of appointment;(vii) A health care directive under chapter 70.122 RCW;(viii) A document appointing an agent to dispose of an individual's remains, directing disposition of an individual's remains after death, or expressing wishes regarding an anatomical gift;(ix) A nomination of a guardian or conservator for the signing individual;(x) A nomination of a guardian or conservator for a minor child or disabled adult child or a delegation of parental powers for a minor child pursuant to RCW 11.130.145;(xi) A mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW;(xii) A community property agreement as described in RCW 26.16.120;(xiii) A disclaimer under RCW 11.86.011(5);(xiv) A trust decanting under chapter 11.107 RCW;(xv) A separate writing directing the disposition of tangible personal property under RCW 11.12.260; and(xvi) Any other record intended to carry out an individual's intent regarding property or health care while incapacitated or on death; and(b) Does not include:(i) A deed of real property or certificate of title for a motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft; or(ii) A nonjudicial settlement agreement under RCW 11.96A.220.(5) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.(6) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures.(7) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to:(a) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(b) Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic signature.(8) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. Sections 1 through 21 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. SEVERABILITY.If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---